District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.05

Effect of merger.

(a)

When a merger becomes effective:

(1)

The surviving company shall continue or come into existence;

(2)

Each constituent company that merges into the surviving company shall cease to exist as a separate entity;

(3)

All property owned by each constituent company that ceases to exist shall vest in the surviving company;

(4)

All debts, obligations, or other liabilities of each constituent company that ceases to exist shall continue as debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the surviving company;

(5)

An action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent company that ceases to exist may be continued as if the merger had not occurred;

(6)

Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent company that ceases to exist shall vest in the surviving company;

(7)

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect; and

(8)

Except as otherwise agreed, if a constituent company ceases to exist, the merger shall not dissolve the limited liability company for the purposes of subchapter VII of this chapter;

(9)

If the surviving company is created by the merger, the certificate of organization shall become effective; and

(10)

If the surviving company preexisted the merger, any amendments provided for in the articles of merger for its certificate or organization shall become effective.

(b)

A surviving company that is a foreign limited liability company consents to the jurisdiction of the Superior Court to enforce any debt, obligation, or other liability owed by a constituent company, if before the merger the constituent company was subject to suit in the District on the debt, obligation, or other liability. A surviving company that is a foreign limited liability company and not authorized to do business in the District may be served with process for the purposes of enforcing a debt, obligation, or other liability under this subsection in the same manner and with the same consequences as in § 29-104.12.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-809.04.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1005 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).